engine/dictionaries/es/es_GT.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX ú Y 66
SFX ú cer gámonos acer
SFX ú acer áganse acer
SFX ú acer ágase acer
SFX ú er igámonos aer
SFX ú aer áiganse aer
SFX ú aer áigase aer
SFX ú er gámonos [ln]er
SFX ú aler álganse aler
SFX ú aler álgase aler
SFX ú ir gámonos [ln]ir
SFX ú alir álganse alir
SFX ú alir álgase alir
SFX ú ecir igámonos ecir
SFX ú ecir íganse ecir
SFX ú ecir ígase ecir
SFX ú edir idámonos edir
SFX ú edir ídanse edir
SFX ú edir ídase edir
SFX ú eguir igámonos eguir
SFX ú eguir íganse eguir
SFX ú eguir ígase eguir
SFX ú eír iámonos eír
SFX ú eír íanse eír
SFX ú eír íase eír
SFX ú ener énganse ener
SFX ú ener éngase ener
SFX ú enir énganse enir
SFX ú enir éngase enir
SFX ú entir iéntanse entir
SFX ú entir iéntase entir
SFX ú entir intámonos entir
SFX ú eñir iñámonos eñir
SFX ú eñir íñanse eñir
SFX ú eñir íñase eñir
SFX ú er éanse ver
SFX ú er éase ver
SFX ú r ámonos ver
SFX ú erir iéranse erir
SFX ú erir iérase erir
SFX ú erir irámonos erir
SFX ú ervir irvámonos ervir
SFX ú ervir írvanse ervir
SFX ú ervir írvase ervir
SFX ú ertir iértanse ertir
SFX ú ertir iértase ertir
SFX ú ertir irtámonos ertir
SFX ú estir istámonos estir
SFX ú estir ístanse estir
SFX ú estir ístase estir
SFX ú etir itámonos etir
SFX ú etir ítanse etir
SFX ú etir ítase etir
SFX ú oner ónganse oner
SFX ú oner óngase oner
SFX ú orir uéranse orir
SFX ú orir uérase orir
SFX ú orir urámonos orir
SFX ú ormir uérmanse ormir
SFX ú ormir uérmase ormir
SFX ú ormir urmámonos ormir
SFX ú ucir úzcanse ucir
SFX ú ucir úzcase ucir
SFX ú cir zcámonos ucir
SFX ú uir úyanse uir
SFX ú uir úyase uir
SFX ú ir yámonos uir
